Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB752.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 214.450 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 214.450[214.452] to 214.466, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Autologous donation" means a process by which an individual donates his or
her own blood for his or her own transfusion;
(2) "Blood" means any blood, blood product, blood component, or blood derivative,
including plasma;[.]
(3) (a)[(2)] "Blood establishment" means a place of business under one (1)
management at one (1) general physical location which engages in the
collection, preparation, processing, labeling, packaging, and dispensing of
blood to any health care facility, health service, or health care provider and
which is licensed by the United States Food and Drug Administration.
(b) "Blood establishment" does not include autologous[ blood] donation
programs permitted under KRS 214.456;[.]
Page 1 of 26
XXXX 2/20/2026 2:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2100
(4)[(3)] "Blood-borne communicable disease" means any of those diseases which are
specifically so defined and set forth in administrative regulation promulgated by the
United States Food and Drug Administration;[.]
(5)[(4)] "Directed donation" means a process by which an individual selects a
specific donor or organization to provide blood for his or her own transfusion;
(6) "Donor" means either a paid or volunteer donor of blood;
(7) "Health facility" means any health facility as defined in[set forth under] KRS
216B.015, which provides for the transfusion of blood into a living human body;[.]
(8)[(5)] "Health care provider" means any person licensed or certified under the laws
of the Commonwealth as a dentist, physician, osteopath, registered nurse, practical
nurse, paramedic, emergency medical technician, or physician assistant;[.]
(9)[(6)] "Health service" means any health service as defined in[set forth under] KRS
216B.015,[ and] which provides for the transfusion of blood into a living human
body;[.]
(10)[(7)] "Informed consent" means the right of a person to be fully informed about
and to consent to or refuse medical treatments, including the selection of blood
donors;
(11) "Transfuse" means to transfer blood from one (1) person to another; and[.
(8) "Donor" means either a paid or volunteer donor of blood.]
(12)[(9)] "Untested blood" means blood that has not been tested or blood for which test
results have not yet been returned.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 214.450 TO 214.466 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) An individual shall have the right to select a willing blood donor for his or her
own blood transfusion, provided the donation complies with the minimum
standard set by the United States Food and Drug Administration.
(2) Blood establishments, health facilities, health services, and health care providers
Page 2 of 26
XXXX 2/20/2026 2:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2100
shall not:
(a) Deny, obstruct, or impose undue burdens on an individual’s right to a
directed or autologous donation, when ordered by a licensed health care
provider;
(b) Refuse directed donations based on a donor’s or recipient’s vaccination
status, medical history, religious beliefs, or other personal choices or
characteristics, provided minimum United States Food and Drug
Administration safety standards are met;
(c) Impose fees for a donation or transfusion using an autologous donation or
directed donation of blood that exceed twenty percent (20%) of the charge
for a regular unit of blood;
(d) Misrepresent the availability, safety, or legality of directed or autologous
donations to discourage a licensed physician from ordering a directed or
autologous donation at the request of their patient; or
(e) Penalize or sanction physicians who facilitate directed or autologous
donations for their willingness to prescribe directed or autologous
donations.
(3) Blood establishments shall:
(a) Publicly disclose the establishment's directed donation policies to ensure
transparency; and
(b) Provide standardized, concise consent forms and procedures for directed
donations, not to exceed the complexity of forms used by the establishment
for general blood donations.
(4) Blood establishments and health care facilities shall provide clear, accessible
information to patients about the patient's right to a directed or autologous
donation and the process for requesting a directed or autologous donation.
(5) A professional organization, health care facility, or other entity shall not
Page 3 of 26
XXXX 2/20/2026 2:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2100
misrepresent the availability, safety, or legality of directed or autologous
donations to discourage a licensed physician from ordering a directed or
autologous donation at the request of their patient.
(6) A physician who facilitates a directed or autologous donation at the request of his
or her patient shall not experience disciplinary actions, loss of license, or other
professional repercussions by the Kentucky Board of Medical Licensure as a
result of the physician's willingness to prescribe the directed or autologous
donation.
(7) A blood establishment or health facility that violates this section shall be subject
to fines not exceeding two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) per violation
as determined by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.
(8) A health facility or health care provider:
(a) May transfuse blood that is not from a directed or autologous donation only
in an emergency situation in which the attending physician determines the
patient is in imminent danger of death or serious physical injury and the
directed or autologous donation is not readily available; and
(b) Shall not be subject to civil or criminal liability for the transfusion of blood
that is not from a directed or autologous donation in an emergency
situation, provided the attending health facility or health care provider has
obtained prior consent for the transfusion from the patient or, if the
patient's condition renders the patient incapable of giving consent, consent
from the patient's next of kin or legal guardian, if available.
(9) The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall:
(a) Establish a reporting mechanism for individuals and physicians to report
obstructions, denials, or impositions of undue burdens to directed
donations;
(b) Investigate reports of obstructions, denials, or impositions of undue burdens
Page 4 of 26
XXXX 2/20/2026 2:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2100
to directed or autologous donations;
(c) Complete investigations within sixty (60) days of a report; and
(d) Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter
13A to implement and enforce the provisions of this section.
(10) An individual may bring a civil action against entities for injunctive relief and
damages for violations of the individual's rights to directed and autologous
donations.
Section 3. KRS 214.452 is amended to read as follows:
The following policies shall apply to blood establishments and to donors of blood:
(1) All blood establishments within the Commonwealth shall be licensed by the United
States Food and Drug Administration and remain in compliance with all applicable
federal regulations. The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall, under
administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, establish
fees necessary to cover the cost of and adhere to a schedule for regular inspection,
by the Office of the Inspector General of the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services, of all blood establishments within the Commonwealth to ascertain
whether each blood establishment is licensed and in compliance with KRS 214.450
to 214.466[214.464] and[ KRS] 214.468. The Office of the Inspector General shall
commence its inspection program of blood establishments no later than September
1, 1994.
(2) All blood establishments shall test blood for the human immunodeficiency virus
and for any known causative agent for any blood-borne communicable disease,
using tests approved and required, for purposes of blood donation, by the United
States Food and Drug Administration.
(3) It shall be the duty of the administrator of any blood establishment which collects
blood for the purpose of distributing to another health service, health facility, or
health-care provider the blood for transfusion to:
Page 5 of 26
XXXX 2/20/2026 2:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2100
(a) Secure donor consent and a signed written risk factor history and donor
consent form for each potential paid or volunteer donor for the purpose of
determining if the potential donor is at high risk for infection with the human
immunodeficiency virus, or has tested confirmatory positive for infection with
the human immunodeficiency virus; or has acquired immune deficiency
syndrome; or has tested confirmatory positive for infection with any causative
agent for acquired immune deficiency syndrome recognized by the United
States Centers for Disease Control; or has a blood-borne communicable
disease;
(b) Provide a means for a potential donor to self-elect not to donate blood;
(c) Refuse donation or sale of blood by persons at high risk for infection with the
human immunodeficiency virus, or who have been medically diagnosed as
having acquired immune deficiency syndrome, or who have tested
confirmatory positive for infection with the human immunodeficiency virus,
or who have a blood-borne communicable disease;
(d) Post a sign in the blood establishment which is visible to all potential donors
and which states: "Persons with acquired immune deficiency syndrome
(AIDS), or who have tested confirmatory positive for infection with the
human immunodeficiency virus (HIV), or who have a blood-borne
communicable disease or who have one (1) or more risk factors for the human
immunodeficiency virus as determined by the United States Centers for
Disease Control, are prohibited by law from donating or selling blood.
Persons violating the law are guilty of a Class D felony. ASK STAFF OF
THIS BLOOD ESTABLISHMENT."
(4) The provisions of this section shall not be construed to impose requirements which
are in conflict with donor eligibility requirements set out in United States Food and
Drug Administration or American Association of Blood Banks standards.
Page 6 of 26
XXXX 2/20/2026 2:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2100
Section 4. KRS 214.456 is amended to read as follows:
The following policies shall apply to autologous and directed blood donations:
(1) Any otherwise qualified donor who wishes to direct a donation of blood to that
person or to another particular individual may do so. The surcharge for any
autologous or directed donation of blood shall not exceed twenty percent (20%) of
the charge for a regular unit of blood.
(2) If the donation is to another particular individual, the requirements of KRS 214.454
shall be met if the recipient and the recipient's attending physician have requested
the donation.
(3) Blood collected as a directed donation may be used for someone other than, or in
addition to, the designated recipient if the donor's blood is not compatible with that
of the designated recipient or if any part of the donation is not needed by the
designated recipient.
(4) Each blood establishment shall advise prospective donors of the opportunity for
autologous and directed donations and of the provisions of this section and of KRS
214.450[214.452] to 214.466.
(5) Autologous blood donation programs shall be exempt from KRS 214.454.
Section 5. KRS 214.990 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Every head of a family who willfully fails or refuses and every physician who fails
or refuses to comply with KRS 214.010 shall be guilty of a violation for each day
he neglects or refuses to report. Repeated failure to report is sufficient cause for the
revocation of a physician's certificate to practice medicine in this state.
(2) Any person who willfully violates any administrative regulation promulgated under
KRS Chapter 13A by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services under KRS
214.020 shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.
(3) Any physician or other person legally permitted to engage in attendance upon a
pregnant woman during pregnancy or at delivery who fails to exercise due diligence
Page 7 of 26
XXXX 2/20/2026 2:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2100
in complying with KRS 214.160 and 214.170 shall be guilty of a violation.
(4) Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS 214.280 to 214.310 shall be
guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
(5) Any person who violates any provision of KRS 214.034 or KRS 158.035 shall be
guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.
(6) Any person who violates any provision of KRS 214.420 shall be guilty of a
violation. Each violation shall constitute a separate offense.
(7) Any person who knowingly violates any provision of KRS 214.450[214.452] to
214.466 shall be guilty of a Class D felony. Each violation shall constitute a
separate offense.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 17A OF KRS CHAPTER 304
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) All health benefit plans shall provide coverage for any directed or autologous
blood transfusion.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the coverage required by this
section shall not be subject to copayments, coinsurance, deductibles, or any other
cost-sharing requirements.
(3) If the application of any requirement of this section would be the sole cause of a
health benefit plan's failure to qualify as a Health Savings Account-qualified
High Deductible Health Plan under 26 U.S.C. sec. 223, as amended, then the
requirement shall not apply to that health benefit plan until the minimum
deductible under 26 U.S.C. sec. 223, as amended, is satisfied.
Section 7. KRS 205.522 is amended to read as follows:
(1) With respect to the administration and provision of Medicaid benefits pursuant to
this chapter, the Department for Medicaid Services, any managed care organization
contracted to provide Medicaid benefits pursuant to this chapter, and the state's
medical assistance program shall be subject to, and comply with, the following, as
Page 8 of 26
XXXX 2/20/2026 2:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2100
applicable:
(a) KRS 304.17A-129;
(b) KRS 304.17A-145;
(c) KRS 304.17A-163;
(d) KRS 304.17A-1631;
(e) KRS 304.17A-167;
(f) KRS 304.17A-235;
(g) KRS 304.17A-257;
(h) KRS 304.17A-259;
(i) KRS 304.17A-263;
(j) KRS 304.17A-264;
(k) KRS 304.17A-515;
(l) KRS 304.17A-580;
(m) KRS 304.17A-600, 304.17A-603, and 304.17A-607;[ and]
(n) KRS 304.17A-740 to 304.17A-743; and
(o) Section 6 of this Act.
(2) A managed care organization contracted to provide Medicaid benefits pursuant to
this chapter shall comply with the reporting requirements of KRS 304.17A-732.
Section 8. KRS 205.6485 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "KCHIP" means the Kentucky Children's Health Insurance
Program.
(2) The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall:
(a) Prepare a state child health plan, known as KCHIP, meeting the requirements
of Title XXI of the Federal Social Security Act, for submission to the
Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services
within such time as will permit the state to receive the maximum amounts of
federal matching funds available under Title XXI; and
Page 9 of 26
XXXX 2/20/2026 2:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2100
(b) By administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter
13A, establish the following:
1. The eligibility criteria for children covered by KCHIP, which shall
include a provision that no person eligible for services under Title XIX
of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. secs. 1396 to 1396v, as amended,
shall be eligible for services under KCHIP, except to the extent that
Title XIX coverage is expanded by KRS 205.6481 to 205.6495 and KRS
304.17A-340;
2. The schedule of benefits to be covered by KCHIP, which shall:
a. Be at least equivalent to one (1) of the following:
i. The standard Blue Cross/Blue Shield preferred provider
option under the Federal Employees Health Benefit Plan
established by 5 U.S.C. sec. 8903(1);
ii. A mid-range health benefit coverage plan that is offered and
generally available to state employees; or
iii. Health insurance coverage offered by a health maintenance
organization that has the largest insured commercial, non-
Medicaid enrollment of covered lives in the state; and
b. Comply with subsection (6) of this section;
3. The premium contribution per family for health insurance coverage
available under KCHIP, which shall be based:
a. On a six (6) month period; and
b. Upon a sliding scale relating to family income not to exceed:
i. Ten dollars ($10), to be paid by a family with income
between one hundred percent (100%) to one hundred thirty-
three percent (133%) of the federal poverty level;
ii. Twenty dollars ($20), to be paid by a family with income
Page 10 of 26
XXXX 2/20/2026 2:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2100
between one hundred thirty-four percent (134%) to one
hundred forty-nine percent (149%) of the federal poverty
level; and
iii. One hundred twenty dollars ($120), to be paid by a family
with income between one hundred fifty percent (150%) to
two hundred percent (200%) of the federal poverty level, and
which may be made on a partial payment plan of twenty
dollars ($20) per month or sixty dollars ($60) per quarter;
4. There shall be no copayments for services provided under KCHIP; and
5. a. The criteria for health services providers and insurers wishing to
contract with the Commonwealth to provide coverage under
KCHIP.
b. The cabinet shall provide, in any contracting process for coverage
of preventive services, the opportunity for a public health
department to bid on preventive health services to eligible children
within the public health department's service area. A public health
department shall not be disqualified from bidding because the
department does not currently offer all the services required by
this section. The criteria shall be set forth in administrative
regulations under KRS Chapter 13A and shall maximize
competition among the providers and insurers. The Finance and
Administration Cabinet shall provide oversight over contracting
policies and procedures to assure that the number of applicants for
contracts is maximized.
(3) Within twelve (12) months of federal approval of the state's Title XXI child health
plan, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall assure that a KCHIP
program is available to all eligible children in all regions of the state. If necessary,
Page 11 of 26
XXXX 2/20/2026 2:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2100
in order to meet this assurance, the cabinet shall institute its own program.
(4) KCHIP recipients shall have direct access without a referral from any gatekeeper
primary care provider to dentists for covered primary dental services and to
optometrists and ophthalmologists for covered primary eye and vision services.
(5) KCHIP shall comply with KRS 304.17A-163 and 304.17A-1631.
(6) The schedule of benefits required under subsection (2)(b)2. of this section shall
include:
(a) Preventive services;
(b) Vision services, including glasses;
(c) Dental services, including sealants, extractions, and fillings; and
(d) The coverage required under:
1. KRS 304.17A-129; [and]
2. KRS 304.17A-145; and
3. Section 6 of this Act.
Section 9. KRS 164.2871 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The governing board of each state postsecondary educational institution is
authorized to purchase liability insurance for the protection of the individual
members of the governing board, faculty, and staff of such institutions from liability
for acts and omissions committed in the course and scope of the individual's
employment or service. Each institution may purchase the type and amount of
liability coverage deemed to best serve the interest of such institution.
(2) All retirement annuity allowances accrued or accruing to any employee of a state
postsecondary educational institution through a retirement program sponsored by
the state postsecondary educational institution are hereby exempt from any state,
county, or municipal tax, and shall not be subject to execution, attachment,
garnishment, or any other process whatsoever, nor shall any assignment thereof be
enforceable in any court. Except retirement benefits accrued or accruing to any
Page 12 of 26
XXXX 2/20/2026 2:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2100
employee of a state postsecondary educational institution through a retirement
program sponsored by the state postsecondary educational institution on or after
January 1, 1998, shall be subject to the tax imposed by KRS 141.020, to the extent
provided in KRS 141.010 and 141.0215.
(3) Except as provided in KRS Chapter 44, the purchase of liability insurance for
members of governing boards, faculty and staff of institutions of higher education
in this state shall not be construed to be a waiver of sovereign immunity or any
other immunity or privilege.
(4) The governing board of each state postsecondary education institution is authorized
to provide a self-insured employer group health plan to its employees, which plan
shall:
(a) Conform to the requirements of Subtitle 32 of KRS Chapter 304; and
(b) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, be exempt from
conformity with Subtitle 17A of KRS Chapter 304.
(5) A self-insured employer group health plan provided by the governing board of a
state postsecondary education institution to its employees shall comply with:
(a) KRS 304.17A-129;
(b) KRS 304.17A-133;
(c) KRS 304.17A-145;
(d) KRS 304.17A-163 and 304.17A-1631;
(e) KRS 304.17A-261;
(f) KRS 304.17A-262;
(g) KRS 304.17A-264;[ and]
(h) KRS 304.17A-265; and
(i) Section 6 of this Act.
(6) (a) A self-insured employer group health plan provided by the governing board of
a state postsecondary education institution to its employees shall provide a
Page 13 of 26
XXXX 2/20/2026 2:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2100
special enrollment period to pregnant women who are eligible for coverage in
accordance with the requirements set forth in KRS 304.17-182.
(b) The governing board of a state postsecondary education institution shall, at or
before the time an employee is initially offered the opportunity to enroll in the
plan or coverage, provide the employee a notice of the special enrollment
rights under this subsection.
Section 10. KRS 18A.225 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The term "employee" for purposes of this section means:
1. Any person, including an elected public official, who is regularly
employed by any department, office, board, agency, or branch of state
government; or by a public postsecondary educational institution; or by
any city, urban-county, charter county, county, or consolidated local
government, whose legislative body has opted to participate in the state-
sponsored health insurance program pursuant to KRS 79.080; and who
is either a contributing member to any one (1) of the retirement systems
administered by the state, including but not limited to the Kentucky
Retirement Systems, County Employees Retirement System, Kentucky
Teachers' Retirement System, the Legislators' Retirement Plan, or the
Judicial Retirement Plan; or is receiving a contractual contribution from
the state toward a retirement plan; or, in the case of a public
postsecondary education institution, is an individual participating in an
optional retirement plan authorized by KRS 161.567; or is eligible to
participate in a retirement plan established by an employer who ceases
participating in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System pursuant to
KRS 61.522 whose employees participated in the health insurance plans
administered by the Personnel Cabinet prior to the employer's effective
cessation date in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System;
Page 14 of 26
XXXX 2/20/2026 2:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2100
2. Any certified or classified employee of a local board of education or a
public charter school as defined in KRS 160.1590;
3. Any elected member of a local board of education;
4. Any person who is a present or future recipient of a retirement
allowance from the Kentucky Retirement Systems, County Employees
Retirement System, Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System, the
Legislators' Retirement Plan, the Judicial Retirement Plan, or the
Kentucky Community and Technical College System's optional
retirement plan authorized by KRS 161.567, except that a person who is
receiving a retirement allowance and who is age sixty-five (65) or older
shall not be included, with the exception of persons covered under KRS
61.702(2)(b)3. and 78.5536(2)(b)3., unless he or she is actively
employed pursuant to subparagraph 1. of this paragraph; and
5. Any eligible dependents and beneficiaries of participating employees
and retirees who are entitled to participate in the state-sponsored health
insurance program;
(b) The term "health benefit plan" for the purposes of this section means a health
benefit plan as defined in KRS 304.17A-005;
(c) The term "insurer" for the purposes of this section means an insurer as defined
in KRS 304.17A-005; and
(d) The term "managed care plan" for the purposes of this section means a
managed care plan as defined in KRS 304.17A-500.
(2) (a) The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, upon the
recommendation of the secretary of the Personnel Cabinet, shall procure, in
compliance with the provisions of KRS 45A.080, 45A.085, and 45A.090,
from one (1) or more insurers authorized to do business in this state, a group
health benefit plan that may include but not be limited to health maintenance
Page 15 of 26
XXXX 2/20/2026 2:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2100
organization (HMO), preferred provider organization (PPO), point of service
(POS), and exclusive provider organization (EPO) benefit plans
encompassing all or any class or classes of employees. With the exception of
employers governed by the provisions of KRS Chapters 16, 18A, and 151B,
all employers of any class of employees or former employees shall enter into
a contract with the Personnel Cabinet prior to including that group in the state
health insurance group. The contracts shall include but not be limited to
designating the entity responsible for filing any federal forms, adoption of
policies required for proper plan administration, acceptance of the contractual
provisions with health insurance carriers or third-party administrators, and
adoption of the payment and reimbursement methods necessary for efficient
administration of the health insurance program. Health insurance coverage
provided to state employees under this section shall, at a minimum, contain
the same benefits as provided under Kentucky Kare Standard as of January 1,
1994, and shall include a mail-order drug option as provided in subsection
(13) of this section. All employees and other persons for whom the health care
coverage is provided or made available shall annually be given an option to
elect health care coverage through a self-funded plan offered by the
Commonwealth or, if a self-funded plan is not available, from a list of
coverage options determined by the competitive bid process under the
provisions of KRS 45A.080, 45A.085, and 45A.090 and made available
during annual open enrollment.
(b) The policy or policies shall be approved by the commissioner of insurance
and may contain the provisions the commissioner of insurance approves,
whether or not otherwise permitted by the insurance laws.
(c) Any carrier bidding to offer health care coverage to employees shall agree to
provide coverage to all members of the state group, including active
Page 16 of 26
XXXX 2/20/2026 2:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2100
employees and retirees and their eligible covered dependents and
beneficiaries, within the county or counties specified in its bid. Except as
provided in subsection (20) of this section, any carrier bidding to offer health
care coverage to employees shall also agree to rate all employees as a single
entity, except for those retirees whose former employers insure their active
employees outside the state-sponsored health insurance program and as
otherwise provided in KRS 61.702(2)(b)3.b. and 78.5536(2)(b)3.b.
(d) Any carrier bidding to offer health care coverage to employees shall agree to
provide enrollment, claims, and utilization data to the Commonwealth in a
format specified by the Personnel Cabinet with the understanding that the data
shall be owned by the Commonwealth; to provide data in an electronic form
and within a time frame specified by the Personnel Cabinet; and to be subject
to penalties for noncompliance with data reporting requirements as specified
by the Personnel Cabinet. The Personnel Cabinet shall take strict precautions
to protect the confidentiality of each individual employee; however,
confidentiality assertions shall not relieve a carrier from the requirement of
providing stipulated data to the Commonwealth.
(e) The Personnel Cabinet shall develop the necessary techniques and capabilities
for timely analysis of data received from carriers and, to the extent possible,
provide in the request-for-proposal specifics relating to data requirements,
electronic reporting, and penalties for noncompliance. The Commonwealth
shall own the enrollment, claims, and utilization data provided by each carrier
and shall develop methods to protect the confidentiality of the individual. The
Personnel Cabinet shall include in the October annual report submitted
pursuant to the provisions of KRS 18A.226 to the Governor, the General
Assembly, and the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, an analysis of the
financial stability of the program, which shall include but not be limited to
Page 17 of 26
XXXX 2/20/2026 2:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2100
loss ratios, methods of risk adjustment, measurements of carrier quality of
service, prescription coverage and cost management, and statutorily required
mandates. If state self-insurance was available as a carrier option, the report
also shall provide a detailed financial analysis of the self-insurance fund
including but not limited to loss ratios, reserves, and reinsurance agreements.
(f) If any agency participating in the state-sponsored employee health insurance
program for its active employees terminates participation and there is a state
appropriation for the employer's contribution for active employees' health
insurance coverage, then neither the agency nor the employees shall receive
the state-funded contribution after termination from the state-sponsored
employee health insurance program.
(g) Any funds in flexible spending accounts that remain after all reimbursements
have been processed shall be transferred to the credit of the state-sponsored
health insurance plan's appropriation account.
(h) Each entity participating in the state-sponsored health insurance program shall
provide an amount at least equal to the state contribution rate for the employer
portion of the health insurance premium. For any participating entity that used
the state payroll system, the employer contribution amount shall be equal to
but not greater than the state contribution rate.
(3) The premiums may be paid by the policyholder:
(a) Wholly from funds contributed by the employee, by payroll deduction or
otherwise;
(b) Wholly from funds contributed by any department, board, agency, public
postsecondary education institution, or branch of state, city, urban-county,
charter county, county, or consolidated local government; or
(c) Partly from each, except that any premium due for health care coverage or
dental coverage, if any, in excess of the premium amount contributed by any
Page 18 of 26
XXXX 2/20/2026 2:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2100
department, board, agency, postsecondary education institution, or branch of
state, city, urban-county, charter county, county, or consolidated local
government for any other health care coverage shall be paid by the employee.
(4) If an employee moves his or her place of residence or employment out of the
service area of an insurer offering a managed health care plan, under which he or
she has elected coverage, into either the service area of another managed health care
plan or into an area of the Commonwealth not within a managed health care plan
service area, the employee shall be given an option, at the time of the move or
transfer, to change his or her coverage to another health benefit plan.
(5) No payment of premium by any department, board, agency, public postsecondary
educational institution, or branch of state, city, urban-county, charter county,
county, or consolidated local government shall constitute compensation to an
insured employee for the purposes of any statute fixing or limiting the
compensation of such an employee. Any premium or other expense incurred by any
department, board, agency, public postsecondary educational institution, or branch
of state, city, urban-county, charter county, county, or consolidated local
government shall be considered a proper cost of administration.
(6) The policy or policies may contain the provisions with respect to the class or classes
of employees covered, amounts of insurance or coverage for designated classes or
groups of employees, policy options, terms of eligibility, and continuation of
insurance or coverage after retirement.
(7) Group rates under this section shall be made available to the disabled child of an
employee regardless of the child's age if the entire premium for the disabled child's
coverage is paid by the state employee. A child shall be considered disabled if he or
she has been determined to be eligible for federal Social Security disability benefits.
(8) The health care contract or contracts for employees shall be entered into for a
period of not less than one (1) year.
Page 19 of 26
XXXX 2/20/2026 2:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2100
(9) The secretary shall appoint thirty-two (32) persons to an Advisory Committee of
State Health Insurance Subscribers to advise the secretary or the secretary's
designee regarding the state-sponsored health insurance program for employees.
The secretary shall appoint, from a list of names submitted by appointing
authorities, members representing school districts from each of the seven (7)
Supreme Court districts, members representing state government from each of the
seven (7) Supreme Court districts, two (2) members representing retirees under age
sixty-five (65), one (1) member representing local health departments, two (2)
members representing the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System, and three (3)
members at large. The secretary shall also appoint two (2) members from a list of
five (5) names submitted by the Kentucky Education Association, two (2) members
from a list of five (5) names submitted by the largest state employee organization of
nonschool state employees, two (2) members from a list of five (5) names submitted
by the Kentucky Association of Counties, two (2) members from a list of five (5)
names submitted by the Kentucky League of Cities, and two (2) members from a
list of names consisting of five (5) names submitted by each state employee
organization that has two thousand (2,000) or more members on state payroll
deduction. The advisory committee shall be appointed in January of each year and
shall meet quarterly.
(10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the policy or policies
provided to employees pursuant to this section shall not provide coverage for
obtaining or performing an abortion, nor shall any state funds be used for the
purpose of obtaining or performing an abortion on behalf of employees or their
dependents.
(11) Interruption of an established treatment regime with maintenance drugs shall be
grounds for an insured to appeal a formulary change through the established appeal
procedures approved by the Department of Insurance, if the physician supervising
Page 20 of 26
XXXX 2/20/2026 2:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2100
the treatment certifies that the change is not in the best interests of the patient.
(12) Any employee who is eligible for and elects to participate in the state health
insurance program as a retiree, or the spouse or beneficiary of a retiree, under any
one (1) of the state-sponsored retirement systems shall not be eligible to receive the
state health insurance contribution toward health care coverage as a result of any
other employment for which there is a public employer contribution. This does not
preclude a retiree and an active employee spouse from using both contributions to
the extent needed for purchase of one (1) state sponsored health insurance policy
for that plan year.
(13) (a) The policies of health insurance coverage procured under subsection (2) of
this section shall include a mail-order drug option for maintenance drugs for
state employees. Maintenance drugs may be dispensed by mail order in
accordance with Kentucky law.
(b) A health insurer shall not discriminate against any retail pharmacy located
within the geographic coverage area of the health benefit plan and that meets
the terms and conditions for participation established by the insurer, including
price, dispensing fee, and copay requirements of a mail-order option. The
retail pharmacy shall not be required to dispense by mail.
(c) The mail-order option shall not permit the dispensing of a controlled
substance classified in Schedule II.
(14) The policy or policies provided to state employees or their dependents pursuant to
this section shall provide coverage for obtaining a hearing aid and acquiring hearing
aid-related services for insured individuals under eighteen (18) years of age, subject
to a cap of one thousand four hundred dollars ($1,400) every thirty-six (36) months
pursuant to KRS 304.17A-132.
(15) Any policy provided to state employees or their dependents pursuant to this section
shall provide coverage for the diagnosis and treatment of autism spectrum disorders
Page 21 of 26
XXXX 2/20/2026 2:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2100
consistent with KRS 304.17A-142.
(16) Any policy provided to state employees or their dependents pursuant to this section
shall provide coverage for obtaining amino acid-based elemental formula pursuant
to KRS 304.17A-258.
(17) If a state employee's residence and place of employment are in the same county,
and if the hospital located within that county does not offer surgical services,
intensive care services, obstetrical services, level II neonatal services, diagnostic
cardiac catheterization services, and magnetic resonance imaging services, the
employee may select a plan available in a contiguous county that does provide
those services, and the state contribution for the plan shall be the amount available
in the county where the plan selected is located.
(18) If a state employee's residence and place of employment are each located in
counties in which the hospitals do not offer surgical services, intensive care
services, obstetrical services, level II neonatal services, diagnostic cardiac
catheterization services, and magnetic resonance imaging services, the employee
may select a plan available in a county contiguous to the county of residence that
does provide those services, and the state contribution for the plan shall be the
amount available in the county where the plan selected is located.
(19) The Personnel Cabinet is encouraged to study whether it is fair and reasonable and
in the best interests of the state group to allow any carrier bidding to offer health
care coverage under this section to submit bids that may vary county by county or
by larger geographic areas.
(20) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the bid for proposals for health
insurance coverage for calendar year 2004 shall include a bid scenario that reflects
the statewide rating structure provided in calendar year 2003 and a bid scenario that
allows for a regional rating structure that allows carriers to submit bids that may
vary by region for a given product offering as described in this subsection:
Page 22 of 26
XXXX 2/20/2026 2:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2100
(a) The regional rating bid scenario shall not include a request for bid on a
statewide option;
(b) The Personnel Cabinet shall divide the state into geographical regions which
shall be the same as the partnership regions designated by the Department for
Medicaid Services for purposes of the Kentucky Health Care Partnership
Program established pursuant to 907 KAR 1:705;
(c) The request for proposal shall require a carrier's bid to include every county
within the region or regions for which the bid is submitted and include but not
be restricted to a preferred provider organization (PPO) option;
(d) If the Personnel Cabinet accepts a carrier's bid, the cabinet shall award the
carrier all of the counties included in its bid within the region. If the Personnel
Cabinet deems the bids submitted in accordance with this subsection to be in
the best interests of state employees in a region, the cabinet may award the
contract for that region to no more than two (2) carriers; and
(e) Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the Personnel Cabinet from including
other requirements or criteria in the request for proposal.
(21) Any fully insured health benefit plan or self-insured plan issued or renewed on or
after July 12, 2006, to public employees pursuant to this section which provides
coverage for services rendered by a physician or osteopath duly licensed under KRS
Chapter 311 that are within the scope of practice of an optometrist duly licensed
under the provisions of KRS Chapter 320 shall provide the same payment of
coverage to optometrists as allowed for those services rendered by physicians or
osteopaths.
(22) Any fully insured health benefit plan or self-insured plan issued or renewed to
public employees pursuant to this section shall comply with:
(a) KRS 304.12-237;
(b) KRS 304.17A-270 and 304.17A-525;
Page 23 of 26
XXXX 2/20/2026 2:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2100
(c) KRS 304.17A-600 to 304.17A-633;
(d) KRS 205.593;
(e) KRS 304.17A-700 to 304.17A-730;
(f) KRS 304.14-135;
(g) KRS 304.17A-580 and 304.17A-641;
(h) KRS 304.99-123;
(i) KRS 304.17A-138;
(j) KRS 304.17A-148;
(k) KRS 304.17A-163 and 304.17A-1631;
(l) KRS 304.17A-265;
(m) KRS 304.17A-261;
(n) KRS 304.17A-262;
(o) KRS 304.17A-145;
(p) KRS 304.17A-129;
(q) KRS 304.17A-133;
(r) KRS 304.17A-264;[ and]
(s) Section 6 of this Act; and
(t) Administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to statutes listed in this
subsection.
(23) (a) Any fully insured health benefit plan or self-insured plan issued or renewed to
public employees pursuant to this section shall provide a special enrollment
period to pregnant women who are eligible for coverage in accordance with
the requirements set forth in KRS 304.17-182.
(b) The Department of Employee Insurance shall, at or before the time a public
employee is initially offered the opportunity to enroll in the plan or coverage,
provide the employee a notice of the special enrollment rights under this
subsection.
Page 24 of 26
XXXX 2/20/2026 2:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2100
Section 11. Sections 2 and 6 of this Act may be cited as the Medical Autonomy
and Directed Donation Act.
Section 12. Sections 6, 9, and 10 of this Act apply to health benefit plans issued
or renewed on or after January 1, 2027.
Section 13. Notwithstanding KRS 194A.099:
(1) Within 90 days of the effective date of this section, the Department of
Insurance shall identify, in accordance with 45 C.F.R. sec. 155.170(a)(3), whether the
application of any requirement of Section 6 of this Act to a qualified health plan (QHP) is
in addition to the essential health benefits required under federal law;
(2) If it is determined that the application of any requirement of Section 3 of this
Act to a QHP is in addition to the essential health benefits required under federal law,
then the department shall, within 180 days of the effective date of this section, apply for a
waiver under 42 U.S.C. sec. 18052, as amended, or any other applicable federal law of all
or any of the cost defrayal requirements under 42 U.S.C. sec. 18031(d)(3) and 45 C.F.R.
sec. 155.170, as amended; and
(3) The application required under subsection (2) of this section:
(a) Shall comply with the requirements of federal law for obtaining a waiver; and
(b) May propose changes to the state's EHB-benchmark plan, as defined in 45
C.F.R. sec. 156.20, that are not in conflict with existing state law.
Section 14. If the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or the Department for
Medicaid Services determines that a state plan amendment, waiver, or any other form of
authorization or approval from any federal agency to implement Section 7 and 8 of this
Act is necessary to prevent the loss of federal funds or to comply with federal law, the
cabinet or department:
(1) Shall, within 90 days after the effective date of this section, request the
necessary federal authorization or approval to implement Sections 7 and 8 of this Act;
and
Page 25 of 26
XXXX 2/20/2026 2:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2100
(2) May only delay implementation of the provisions of Sections 7 and 8 of this
Act for which federal authorization or approval was deemed necessary until the federal
authorization or approval is granted.
Section 15. Sections 7, 8, and 14 of this Act shall constitute the specific
authorization required under KRS 205.5372(1).
Section 16. Sections 6 to 12 of this Act take effect January 1, 2027.
Page 26 of 26
XXXX 2/20/2026 2:07 PM Jacketed